Missouri, session 2026, HB3528.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 192, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 192.529, to read as follows:
192.529. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Environmental Exposure Early Cancer Detection Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "At-risk populations", individuals residing, attending school, or working in
areas with documented environmental exposure to carcinogens;
(2) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(3) "Liquid biopsy", a noninvasive blood test that detects DNA fragments
indicative of multiple types of cancers before symptoms arise;
(4) "Precision", the deliberate integration of advanced diagnostic methods to
improve health outcomes and reduce disparities among populations most at risk of late-
stage cancer diagnoses;
(5) "Screening program", the pilot multicancer detection liquid biopsy screening
program described in subsection 3 of this section;
(6) "Testing entity", a health system that:
(a) Has a large primary care provider base with extensive experience that
practices precision medicine;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3528 2
(b) Uses a multicancer liquid biopsy test that tests for more than fifty types of
cancer and that includes signal of origin;
(c) Has patient-facing web-based education on the multicancer liquid biopsy test
and the implications of participating in the screening program;
(d) Has an established peer-review process to review positive results on the
multicancer liquid biopsy test; and
(e) Has a process for shared decision-making with patients following the receipt
of results on the multicancer liquid biopsy test.
3. (1) The department, in collaboration with a testing entity, shall develop and
implement a pilot multicancer detection liquid biopsy screening program that screens
participants for cancer using a multicancer liquid biopsy test.
(2) The screening program shall:
(a) Prioritize voluntary screening for identified at-risk populations;
(b) Establish accessible pathways for participation, ensuring geographic and
economic equity; and
(c) Collaborate with health care providers and community organizations for
effective outreach, education, and enrollment of eligible individuals.
4. (1) The general assembly shall appropriate funds sufficient to support the
implementation, management, and evaluation of a pilot program to assist individuals
with prolonged exposure to toxic agents including, but not limited to:
(a) Individuals residing, attending school, or working in environmentally
contaminated areas, such as those near Coldwater Creek and Weldon Spring; and
(b) First responders, with priority for assistance given to firefighters.
(2) The department shall pursue available federal grants and public-private
partnerships to enhance funding and resource availability.
(3) Funds appropriated in accordance with this subsection shall specifically
support patient outreach, counseling, and testing costs for individuals with prolonged
exposure to toxic agents.
5. The department shall submit to the general assembly and make publicly
available an annual report on the screening program detailing participation rates,
cancer detection rates, stage of diagnosis for participants diagnosed with cancer,
demographic analyses, cost-effectiveness, and recommendations for improvement.
6. (1) An advisory council is hereby established within the department to work
with the testing entity to define at-risk populations and oversee the implementation and
progress of the screening program as well as the compliance of the screening program
with the requirements of this section. The advisory council shall be composed of eleven
members, appointed by the director of the department, and shall include medical

HB 3528 3
experts, patient advocates, environmental health specialists, and representatives from
impacted communities.
(2) The advisory council shall regularly review screening program data from the
testing entity and provide strategic recommendations to the testing entity to ensure
ongoing program improvement and equitable access.
✔